New York, session 2025-2026, S4145.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 378 of the social services law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. (a) No such license or certificate shall be awarded to a prospec- 4 tive foster parent prior to chemical testing, including, but not limited 5 to, drug and alcohol testing. Notwithstanding any other provision of law 6 to the contrary, an application for certification or licensure or 7 approval of a prospective foster parent shall be denied where such chem- 8 ical testing reveals a positive presence of drugs or alcohol in such 9 prospective foster parent. 10 (b) The office of children and family services shall issue random 11 chemical testing to foster parents, including, but not limited to, drug 12 testing. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07738-01-5